Missouri, session 2026, HB3126.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 115, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 115.1700, to read as follows:
115.1700. 1. As used in this section the term "cast vote record (CVR)" shall
mean an electronic record of a voter's ballot selections created using an electronic voting
device, ballot marking device, ballot-counting scanner, or other similar device.
2. Local election authorities may publish on their websites images of voted
ballots, including the ballot's cast vote record, provided that any personally identifiable
information on such ballot and CVR has been redacted.
3. Ballot images and CVRs may be retained in the same manner as other election
records are retained under the provisions of section 115.493.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.